test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vov_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - вӧв: # Noun 'horse / лошадь'

     вӧв+N+Sg+Nom: вӧв
     вӧв+N+Sg+Gen: вӧвлӧн
     вӧв+N+Sg+Abl: вӧвлысь
     вӧв+N+Sg+Dat: вӧвлы
     вӧв+N+Sg+Acc: вӧлӧс
     вӧв+N+Sg+Ins: вӧлӧн
     вӧв+N+Sg+Com: вӧвкӧд
     вӧв+N+Sg+Car: вӧвтӧг
     вӧв+N+Sg+Cns: вӧвла
     вӧв+N+Sg+Cmpr: вӧвся
     вӧв+N+Sg+Ine: вӧлын
     вӧв+N+Sg+Ela: вӧлысь
     вӧв+N+Sg+Ill: вӧлӧ
     вӧв+N+Sg+Apr: вӧвлань
     вӧв+N+Sg+Egr: вӧвсянь
     вӧв+N+Sg+Ter: вӧлӧдз
     вӧв+N+Sg+Tra: вӧвті
     вӧв+N+Sg+Prl: вӧлӧд
     вӧв+N+Pl+Nom: вӧвъяс
     вӧв+N+Pl+Gen: вӧвъяслӧн
     вӧв+N+Pl+Abl: вӧвъяслысь
     вӧв+N+Pl+Acc: вӧвъясӧс
     вӧв+N+Pl+Dat: вӧвъяслы
     вӧв+N+Pl+Cmpr: вӧвъясся
     вӧв+N+Pl+Cns: вӧвъясла
     вӧв+N+Pl+Ins: вӧвъясӧн
     вӧв+N+Pl+Ill: вӧвъясӧ
     вӧв+N+Pl+Ine: вӧвъясын
     вӧв+N+Pl+Ela: вӧвъясысь
     вӧв+N+Pl+Car: вӧвъястӧг
     вӧв+N+Pl+Egr: вӧвъяссянь
     вӧв+N+Pl+Tra: вӧвъясті
     вӧв+N+Pl+Apr: вӧвъяслань
     вӧв+N+Pl+Ter: вӧвъясӧдз
     вӧв+N+Pl+Prl: вӧвъясӧд
